en: Toy helicopter control type: App-controlled (smartphone/tablet); Gesture control; Handheld remote control; No control (free flight); Other
fr: Type de commande de l’hélicoptère jouet: Contrôlé par appli (smartphone/tablette); Contrôle gestuel; Télécommande manuelle; Aucun contrôle (vol libre); Autre
nb: Kontrolltype for lekehelikopter: App-styrt (smarttelefon/nettbrett); Bevegelsesstyring; Håndholdt fjernkontroll; Ingen styring (fri flyvning); Annet
hu: Játékhelikopter irányítási módja: Alkalmazásvezérelt (okostelefon/táblagép); Gesztusvezérelt; Kézi távirányítós; Vezérlés nélküli (szabad repülés); Egyéb
vi: Máy bay trực thăng đồ chơi điều khiển: Điều khiển bằng ứng dụng (điện thoại thông minh/máy tính bảng); Điều khiển bằng cử chỉ; Điều khiển từ xa cầm tay; Không điều khiển (bay tự do); Khác
sk-SK: Typ ovládania hračkárskeho vrtuľníka: Riadené aplikáciou (smartfón/tablet); Ovládanie gestami; Ručné diaľkové ovládanie; Bez ovládania (voľný let); Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta upravljanja helikopterom igračkom: Upravljanje aplikacijom (pametni telefon / tablet); Upravljanje gestama; Ručni daljinski upravljač; Bez upravljanja (slobodan let); Ostalo
pl: Rodzaj sterowania zabawkowym helikopterem: Sterowanie aplikacją (smartfon/tablet); Sterowanie gestami; Ręczny pilot zdalnego sterowania; Brak sterowania (swobodny lot); Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de controlo do helicóptero de brinquedo: Controlado por app (smartphone/tablet); Controlo por gestos; Comando portátil; Sem controlo (voo livre); Outro
ko: 장난감 헬리콥터 조종 방식: 앱 제어(스마트폰/태블릿); 제스처 제어; 휴대용 리모컨; 제어 없음(자유 비행); 기타
nl: Speelgoedhelikopter besturingstype: App-bediend (smartphone/tablet); Gebarenbediening; Handafstandsbediening; Geen bediening (vrije vlucht); Overig
ja: おもちゃのヘリコプター操作タイプ: アプリ制御 (スマートフォン / タブレット); ジェスチャーコントロール; 手持ち式リモコン; 制御なし (フリーフライト); その他
th: เฮลิคอปเตอร์ของเล่นแบบบังคับ: ควบคุมด้วยแอป (สมาร์ทโฟน/แท็บเล็ต); ควบคุมด้วยท่าทาง; รีโมทคอนโทรลแบบถือ; ไม่สามารถควบคุมได้ (บินอิสระ); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип управление на играчка хеликоптер: Управлявано от приложение (смартфон/таблет); Управление с жестове; Ръчно дистанционно управление; Без управление (свободен полет); Друго
cs: Typ ovládání modelu vrtulníku: Řízené aplikací (smartphone/tablet); Ovládání gesty; Ruční dálkové ovládání; Bez ovládání (volný let); Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta upravljanja igralnega helikopterja: Upravljanje prek aplikacije (pametni telefon/tablica); Upravljanje s potezami; Ročni daljinski upravljalnik; Brez upravljanja (prosti let); Drugo
de: Steuerungsart des Spielzeughubschraubers: App-gesteuert (Smartphone/Tablet); Gestensteuerung; Handfernbedienung; Keine Steuerung (Freiflug); Sonstiges
ro-RO: Tip de control pentru elicopterul de jucărie: Controlat prin app (smartphone/tabletă); Control prin gesturi; Telecomandă portabilă; Fără control (zbor liber); Altele
es: Tipo de control de helicóptero de juguete: Controlado por app (teléfono inteligente/tableta); Control por gestos; Control remoto de mano; Sin control (vuelo libre); Otro
lt-LT: Žaislinio sraigtasparnio valdymo tipas: Valdomas programėle (išmaniuoju telefonu / planšetiniu kompiuteriu); Valdymas gestais; Rankinis nuotolinio valdymo pultas; Be valdymo (laisvas skrydis); Kita
it: Tipo di controllo dell'elicottero giocattolo: Controllato da app (smartphone/tablet); Controllo gestuale; Radiocomando portatile; Nessun controllo (volo libero); Altro
el: Τύπος ελέγχου παιχνιδιού ελικοπτέρου: Με έλεγχο μέσω εφαρμογής (smartphone/tablet); Έλεγχος με κινήσεις; Τηλεχειριστήριο χειρός; Χωρίς έλεγχο (ελεύθερη πτήση); Άλλο
pt-BR: Helicóptero de brinquedo tipo de controle: Controlado por app (smartphone/tablet); Controle por gestos; Controle remoto de mão; Sem controle (voo livre); Outros
sv: Kontrolltyp för leksakshelikopter: Appstyrd (smarttelefon/surfplatta); Geststyrning; Handhållen fjärrkontroll; Ingen styrning (fri flygning); Övrigt
zh-TW: 玩具直升機控制類型: app 控制 (智慧型手機/平板電腦); 手勢控制; 手持遙控器; 無控制 (自由飛行); 其他
tr: Oyuncak helikopter kumanda tipi: Uygulama kontrollü (akıllı telefon/tablet); Hareket kontrollü; Elde taşınır uzaktan kumanda; Kontrol yok (serbest uçuş); Diğer
da: Betjeningstype for legetøjshelikopter: App-styret (smartphone/tablet); Gestusstyring; Håndholdt fjernbetjening; Ingen styring (fri flyvning); Andet
fi: Leluhelikopterin ohjaustyyppi: Sovellusohjattu (älypuhelin/tabletti); Eleohjaus; Käsikaukosäädin; Ei ohjausta (vapaa lento); Muu
ru: Тип управления игрушечным вертолетом: Управление через приложение (смартфон/планшет); Управление жестами; Пульт дистанционного управления; Без управления (свободный полет); Другое
zh-CN: 玩具直升机控制类型: 应用控制（智能手机/平板电脑）; 手势控制; 手持遥控器; 无控制（自由飞行）; 其他